California statutes. Public Utilities Code
The commission at any time subsequent to the filing of the petition, and prior to making and filing its finding of just compensation, may authorize the amendment of the petition, or in case the proceeding is by order on the commission’s own motion may amend the order, by altering or modifying the description of the property or interest therein, or by adding to or deducting from the property or interest therein, or by bringing in any additional party or parties, or in any other respect including jurisdictional allegations.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

1213.

At the time and place specified in the order to show cause, or at such other time and place as, for good cause, is otherwise ordered by the commission, the commission shall proceed to a hearing upon the petition or order on the commission’s own motion. When the proceeding has been submitted the commission shall make and file its finding upon the question whether the use to which the property or interest therein is to be applied is a use authorized by law and whether the taking is necessary to such use, and shall make and file its written finding fixing the just compensation to be paid for the property or interest. If the commission finds that severance damages should be paid, the just compensation for such damages shall be found and stated separately. The just compensation shall be fixed by the commission as of the day on which the petition was filed or the order on the commission’s own motion was made.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

1214.

The commission shall also make its order designating the party or parties to the proceeding who shall pay the just compensation so fixed, or any portion thereof, the amounts in which it shall be paid, the times at which it shall be paid, the property or interest therein for which it shall be paid, and the owners and claimants of such property or interest to whom it shall be paid. The commission may prescribe any other terms or conditions with reference to the payment of such compensation as the commission deems proper, including a provision that the money due be paid to the commission to be distributed to the parties entitled thereto.

The party or parties whom the commission designates to pay such compensation or any part thereof are thereupon liable therefor, and may be sued in any court of competent jurisdiction by the party or parties entitled to such compensation as provided in the commission’s order. In cases in which the order of the commission authorizing any work to be done under the provisions of this chapter is permissive in character and not mandatory, the commission may prescribe the time within which the party receiving such permission shall elect to proceed and notify the commission thereof, and only in the event such party elects to proceed and so notifies the commission shall any liability arise to pay the compensation or any part thereof under the provisions of this section. When any political subdivision of the State is designated by the commission to pay such compensation or any portion thereof it shall be collectible in the manner provided in Section 1203 for the collection of expenses apportioned by the commission to political subdivisions of the State.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

1215.

When the just compensation has been paid in accordance with the commission’s order, the commission shall make its final order of condemnation which shall describe the property or interest therein condemned and the purpose of such condemnation. A copy of the order certified under the seal of the commission shall thereupon be filed in the office of the recorder of the county in which the property described is situated, and thereupon the property or interest in or to property described therein shall vest in the parties and for the purposes specified in the order.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

1216.

(a) The finding of the commission on the question of the necessity for the taking and the finding fixing the just compensation to be paid for any property or interest in or to property under Sections 1206 to 1216, inclusive, are final and shall not be subject to modification, alteration, reversal, or review by any court of this state.

(b) The provisions of this part with reference to rehearing and review shall be applicable to the findings of the commission made and filed under this chapter. Petitions for rehearing shall be filed within 20 days from the date of making and filing the finding as to which a rehearing is desired.

(c) If a finding of the commission made and filed under this chapter is set aside by the Supreme Court or the court of appeal of the State of California, the matter shall be referred back to the commission for further action in a proceeding before the commission, and the commission may, on taking further action, consider the entire testimony theretofore taken in the proceeding before the commission as well as further testimony, if any, presented in connection with further action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 855, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

1217.

The procedure provided in this chapter shall be alternative and cumulative and not exclusive to the right to pursue any other procedure providing for the acquisition under eminent domain proceedings of property or interest in or to property.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

1218.

Nothing in this chapter shall entitle any owner or claimant of property and interest in or to property to receive damages when the right to receive such damages does not exist under the laws of this State apart from the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

1219.

The Legislature declares that Sections 1201 to 1205, inclusive, are enacted as germane and cognate parts of and as aids to the jurisdiction vested in the commission for the supervision, regulation, and control of railroad and street railroad corporations in this State, and the Legislature further declares that the authority and jurisdiction thus vested in the commission involve matters of state-wide importance and concern and have been enacted in aid of the health, safety, and welfare of the people of this State.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

1220.

The Legislature declares that Sections 1206 to 1218, inclusive, are enacted as a germane and cognate part of and as an aid to the jurisdiction of the commission in the supervision and regulation of railroad and street railroad corporations.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6.5. Protection of Grade Crossings [1231. - 1232.]

1231.

The commission shall allocate and expend any money which may be appropriated, from the State Highway Account in the State Transportation Fund or any other fund, for the purposes specified herein, to cities, counties, and cities and counties, on the basis of need as determined by the commission, to assist them in paying their shares of the cost of constructing grade-crossing protection works on city, county, and city and county streets, roads, and highways. In no event, however, shall the commission allocate or expend to any city, county, or city and county a sum exceeding one-half of its share of the cost of such work.

Funds appropriated for the purposes specified herein shall be available for allocation and expenditure without regard to fiscal years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1231.1.

In each annual proposed budget prepared by the Department of Transportation under Section 165 of the Streets and Highways Code, the sum of one million dollars ($1,000,000) shall be set aside for allocations to the Public Utilities Commission for the purpose of paying to the railroad or street railroad corporations the share of the costs to cities, counties, and cities and counties of maintaining automatic grade-crossing protection. The Public Utilities Commission may recommend a sum greater than one million dollars ($1,000,000) be set aside for allocations to the Public Utilities Commission for the purpose of making those payments, if the Public Utilities Commission finds that the sum of one million dollars ($1,000,000) is not sufficient due to an increase in the number of grade-crossing protection devices, or increase in the cost of maintenance of those devices. The specific amount of the total allocation shall be determined by the California Transportation Commission and shall constitute the amount necessary for that maintenance. In arriving at the amount, the California Transportation Commission shall consult with the Public Utilities Commission. Payment shall be made on the basis of verified claims filed with the Public Utilities Commission by the railroad or street railroad corporation responsible for maintenance of automatic grade-crossing protection. Any amounts not expended by the Public Utilities Commission in any one fiscal year may be credited to subsequent annual allocations.

Funds appropriated for the purposes of this section shall be available for allocation and expenditure without regard to fiscal years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1524, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1232.

At the time the commission makes each allocation under this chapter, it shall so certify to the State Controller. The commission shall present claims for reimbursement of the state’s share of the cost of construction of projects under any allocations to the State Controller for payment. The State Controller shall make such audit as he deems necessary, before or after disbursement, for the purpose of determining that the money allocated has been expended for the purposes and under the conditions authorized under this chapter; except that prior or subsequent review and approval by the city, county, or city and county in which the grade-crossing protection is maintained of such allocations shall not be required as a condition of disbursement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 612.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Valuation of Public Utility Properties [1351. - 1354.]

1351.

The commission may ascertain for each purpose specified in this part, the value of the property of every public utility in this State and every fact and element of value which in its judgment may or does have any bearing on such value. The commission may make revaluations from time to time and ascertain the value of all additions, betterments, extensions, and new construction to the property of every public utility.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

1352.

For the purpose of ascertaining the matters and things specified in Section 1351, the commission may cause a hearing to be held at such time and place as it may designate. Before any hearing is had, the commission shall give the public utility affected thereby at least 30 days’ written notice, specifying the time and place of the hearing, and such notice shall be sufficient to authorize the commission to inquire into the matters designated in Sections 1351 to 1354, inclusive, but this provision shall not prevent the commission from making any preliminary examination or investigation into those matters. All public utilities affected shall be entitled to be heard and may introduce evidence at such hearing. The evidence introduced at such hearing shall be reduced to writing and certified under the seal of the commission.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

1353.

(a) The commission may make and file its written findings of fact upon matters concerning which evidence has been introduced before it which, in its judgment, have bearing on the value of the property of the public utility affected. These findings shall be subject to review by the courts in the same manner and within the same time as other orders and decisions of the commission.

(b) The findings of the commission so made and filed, when certified under the seal of the commission, shall be admissible in evidence in any action, proceeding, or hearing before the commission or any court in which the commission, the state, or any officer, department, or institution thereof, or any county, city and county, city, or other body politic and the public utility affected may be interested, whether arising under this part, or otherwise. These findings, when so introduced, shall be conclusive evidence of the facts therein stated as of the date therein stated under conditions then existing, and these facts may only be controverted by showing a subsequent change in conditions bearing upon the facts therein determined.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 855, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

1354.

The commission may, from time to time, cause further hearings and investigations to be had for the purpose of making revaluations or ascertaining the value of any additions, betterments, extensions, and new construction made by any public utility subsequent to any prior hearing or investigation, and may examine into all matters which may change, modify, or affect any finding of fact previously made, and may at such time make findings of fact supplementary to those theretofore made. Such hearings shall be had upon the same notice, and be conducted in the same manner, and the findings so made shall have the same force and effect as is provided in this chapter for original notice, hearing, and findings. Findings made at such supplemental hearings or investigations shall be considered in connection with and as a part of the original findings, except insofar as such supplemental findings change or modify the findings made at the original hearing or investigation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Determination of Just Compensation for Acquisition of Utility Properties [1401. - 1421.]

1401.

As used in this chapter, “lands, property, and rights” includes a part or portion thereof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

1402.

As used in this chapter, “political subdivision” means a county, city and county, city, municipal water district, county water district, irrigation district, public utility district, or any other public corporation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

1403.

Any political subdivision may, at any time, file with the commission either a petition of the first class, setting forth the intention of the political subdivision to acquire under eminent domain proceedings, or otherwise, the lands, property, and rights of any character whatsoever of any public utility or a petition of the second class, setting forth the intention of the political subdivision to initiate such proceedings as may be required under the law governing the political subdivision for the purpose of submitting to the voters of the political subdivision a proposition to acquire under eminent domain proceedings, or otherwise, the lands, property, and rights of any character whatsoever of any public utility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 489.)
-------------------------------------------

1404.

Each such petition shall contain the name of the political subdivision appearing as petitioner therein, a description of the lands, property, and rights which the political subdivision intends to acquire, and the names and addresses of all owners and claimants thereof, including each trustee and mortgagee under each deed of trust and mortgage, if known, or a statement that they are unknown. The petition shall pray that the commission fix the just compensation which shall be paid by the political subdivision, under the law, for such lands, property and rights. The petition shall be signed in the name of the political subdivision and verified by the chairman or other presiding officer or by the secretary or clerk of the legislative or other governing body of the political subdivision. At the time the petition is filed, the petitioner shall also file with the commission additional copies thereof equivalent in number to three more than the number of owners and claimants named in the petition.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

1405.

Upon the filing of the petition the commission shall make its order to show cause. The order shall specify the nature of the proceeding, contain a general description of the lands, property, and rights which petitioner desires to acquire by condemnation or otherwise, and direct the owners and claimants named in the petition, who shall also be named in the order, to appear before the commission at a time and place specified in the order, to show cause, if any they have, why the commission should not proceed to hear the petition and to fix the just compensation to be paid for the lands, property, and rights.

The order shall direct the executive director of the commission to serve or cause to be served upon each owner and claimant a copy of the order certified under the seal of the commission to which shall be attached a copy of the petition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 380.)
-------------------------------------------

1405.1.

With respect to water corporations and water companies, the following procedures shall apply:

(a) Upon the filing of the petition, the commission shall make its order to show cause. The order shall specify the nature of the proceeding, contain a general description of the lands, property, and rights which petitioner desires to acquire by condemnation or otherwise, and direct the owners and claimants named in the petition, who shall also be named in the order, to appear before the commission at a time and place specified in the order and to show cause, if any they have, why the commission should not proceed to hear the petition and to fix the just compensation to be paid for the lands, property, and rights.

The order shall direct the executive director of the commission to serve or cause to be served upon each owner and claimant a copy of the order certified under the seal of the commission to which shall be attached a copy of the petition. 

(b) In response to the order to show cause, in response to a petition of the first class, as specified in Section 1403, the respondent public utility, or the owners of more than one-half interest in the public utility, may present the commission with a certified copy of a filed motion to the superior court where the utility property is located to take jurisdiction of the matter. When presented the motion before, or at the time of, the hearing on the order to show cause, the commission shall dismiss the proceeding. The superior court shall then grant the motion to take jurisdiction of the matter. The political subdivision may then file, within 60 days of the court’s granting the motion, an action in eminent domain pursuant to the Code of Civil Procedure and any further proceedings shall be conducted pursuant to those provisions.

(c) All proceedings held pursuant to either subdivision (b) or (d) shall be given priority over all civil cases in accordance with Section 1260.010 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(d) In response to an order to show cause in response to a petition of the second class, as specified in Section 1403, and upon presentation of the motion specified in subdivision (b), the commission shall suspend the proceeding, but shall not dismiss the proceeding. The superior court shall then grant the motion to take limited jurisdiction of the matter solely for the purpose of determining the amount of just compensation. The political subdivision may then file, within 30 days, an action in the nature of eminent domain, solely for the purpose of determining, pursuant to the Evidence Code and the Code of Civil Procedure, the just compensation to be paid for the land, property, and rights. Upon a determination of just compensation, the court shall certify the finding to the commission. The finding shall not be appealable, and the court shall be acting as an agent of the commission in making the finding. The finding shall be binding on the commission as if it had been made by the commission itself pursuant to Section 1411. The commission shall then continue the matter pursuant to this chapter. 

(e) If the respondent public utility, or the owners of more than one-half interest in the public utility, in the case of a petition of either the first or second class, files a motion to remove the matter from the commission to superior court pursuant to this section, the commission and the court shall not make an award of any litigation expenses incurred prior to the commission’s dismissal or suspension of the matter.

(f) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the date of valuation for purposes of just compensation shall be fixed by the superior court as of the day on which the court grants the motion filed by the public utility pursuant to subdivision (b) or (d).

(g) A political subdivision is liable only as provided in Sections 1414 and 1415 for payment of the reasonable expenditures of the owner in any proceeding initiated pursuant to subdivision (d). For purposes of this subdivision, the proceeding before the commission, as used in Section 1415, includes any proceedings conducted pursuant to subdivision (d).

(h) The amendments made to this section by Assembly Bill 616 during the 1987 portion of the 1987–88 Regular Session of the Legislature shall not apply to or affect any petition filed pursuant to this section before January 1, 1988.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1360, Sec. 132.)
-------------------------------------------

1406.

Service of the order to show cause shall be made in accordance with the provisions of the Code of Civil Procedure or by depositing a copy of the order to show cause certified under the seal of the commission with a copy of the petition attached thereto, in the United States mail, enclosed in a sealed envelope, registered, with postage prepaid, addressed to each of the owners or claimants, at the address specified in the petition.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

1407.

If any owner or claimant named in the petition resides out of the State or has departed from the State or cannot after due diligence be found within the State, or conceals himself to avoid service, or is a corporation having no managing or business agent, cashier or secretary or other officer upon whom summons may be served, who, after due diligence, can be found within the State, and the fact appears by affidavit to the satisfaction of the commission, and it also appears by such affidavit or by the petition that a cause of action exists against the owner or claimant on whom the service is to be made or that he is a necessary or proper party to the proceeding, the commission shall make an order that the service be made on such owner or claimant by publication of the commission’s order to show cause. The order shall direct that the publication be made in a newspaper designated by the commission as likely to give notice to the person to be served, and for such time as the commission finds to be reasonable, at least once a week, but publication against an owner or claimant residing out of the State or absent therefrom shall not be less than two months. If the address of any owner or claimant, as stated in the petition, is out of the State, the secretary of the commission shall, within 15 days after the making and filing of the order to show cause, deposit or cause to be deposited a copy of that order, certified under the seal of the commission, with a copy of the petition attached thereto, in the United States mail, enclosed in a sealed envelope, registered, with postage prepaid, addressed to such owner or claimant at the address specified in the petition. When publication is ordered, personal service of a copy of the order to show cause and of the petition out of the State is equivalent to publication and deposit in the United States mail.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

1408.

Within 10 days prior to the time set for the first hearing on the petition, which time shall be not less than 30 days after the filing of the petition, the executive director of the commission shall serve or cause to be served upon the petitioner a written notice specifying the time and place of the hearing. In all respects not in this chapter otherwise specified, service and the proof of service shall be made as provided by the Code of Civil Procedure. Upon the completion of service upon the petitioner or upon any owner or claimant named in the petition, the commission shall have full and complete jurisdiction over such petitioner, owner, or claimant, with full and complete jurisdiction, insofar as such petitioner, owner, or claimant is concerned, to make each finding referred to in this chapter. The failure to make service upon any person alleging that he is an owner or claimant but not named in the petition shall in no way affect the jurisdiction of the commission over owners and claimants on whom service has been made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 373.)
-------------------------------------------

1409.

At the time and place specified in the order to show cause, or at such other time and place as, for good cause, is otherwise ordered by the commission, the commission shall proceed to a hearing on the petition. At such times and in such amounts as is directed by the commission, the political subdivision shall pay to the commission all extra costs as determined by the commission, which the commission incurs to comply with the requirements of this chapter, and if such amounts are not paid by the political subdivision as directed by the commission, the commission may suspend further proceedings on the petition. Evidence may be presented by the political subdivision, by each owner or claimant named in the petition, and by the commission.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

1410.

The commission may, at any time subsequent to the filing of the petition, and prior to making and filing its finding as to just compensation, authorize the amendment of the petition by altering or modifying the description of the lands, property, and rights, or by adding to or deducting from the lands, property, and rights, and in each other respect including jurisdictional allegations.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

1411.

When the proceeding has been submitted, the commission shall make and file its written finding fixing, in a single sum, the just compensation to be paid by the political subdivision for the lands, property, and rights. If the commission finds that severance damages should be paid, the just compensation for such damages shall be found and stated separately. The just compensation shall be fixed by the commission as of the day on which the petition was filed with the commission.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

1412.

Within 20 days after the commission has made and filed its finding, the owner of the lands, property, and rights may file with the legislative or other governing body of the political subdivision a written stipulation consenting and agreeing to accept the just compensation fixed by the commission. Upon the filing of the stipulation, the political subdivision shall proceed with all due diligence to provide the necessary funds under the law governing the providing of such funds, for paying the just compensation fixed by the commission. Whenever the just compensation has been tendered by the political subdivision, a deed of grant, bargain, and sale conveying the owner’s right, title, and interest in and to the lands, property, and rights to the political subdivision shall be executed and delivered by the owner, and the other claimants who have any right, title, or interest in the property shall execute appropriate instruments conveying or releasing to the political subdivision their respective rights, titles, and interests therein. If the deed or the instruments of convenience or release are not executed and delivered within 60 days after such tender has been made, the political subdivision may commence an action in a court of competent jurisdiction or proceed under Section 1413.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

1413.

In the case of a petition of the first class, if the owner does not file the stipulation within such 20 days, the political subdivision, within 60 days after the commission has made and filed its finding, shall commence an action in a court of competent jurisdiction to take such lands, property, and rights, under eminent domain proceedings. In the case of a petition of the second class, if the owner does not file the stipulation within such 20 days, the political subdivision, within 60 days after the commission has made and filed its finding, shall initiate proceedings for the purpose of submitting to its voters a proposition to acquire under eminent domain proceedings the lands, property, and rights. The political subdivision shall not be required, in either case, to delay for more than 20 days after the commission has made and filed its finding, before commencing such further proceedings. In the case of a petition of the second class, if the voters of the political subdivision, as provided by the law governing the political subdivision, vote in favor of any proposition to acquire under eminent domain proceedings, or otherwise, such lands, property, and rights, the political subdivision shall, within 60 days thereafter, commence an action in a court of competent jurisdiction to take such lands, property, and rights, under eminent domain proceedings, unless the owner has filed with the political subdivision a written stipulation consenting and agreeing to accept the just compensation fixed by the commission.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

1414.

If the political subdivision, in a petition of the first class, fails to file such action in a court of competent jurisdiction within such period of 60 days after the commission has made and filed its finding, or if the political subdivision, in a petition of the second class, fails to proceed diligently to submit the proposition to its voters or fails, if its voters have voted in favor of the acquisition of the lands, property, and rights, to file such action in a court of competent jurisdiction within 60 days thereafter, the owner of such lands, property, and rights may file with the commission a verified petition in writing setting forth that fact. The petition may also set forth in detail the expenditures which the owner has necessarily incurred in the proceeding before the commission.

The commission shall thereupon cause written notice, with a copy of the owners’ petition attached thereto, to be served upon the political subdivision, to appear before the commission at a time and place specified in the notice, to show cause why an order should not be made by the commission (a) finding that the political subdivision has failed to pursue diligently its rights, (b) determining that the finding as to just compensation shall no longer be of any force or effect, and (c) determining the reasonable expenditures necessarily incurred by the owner which, in the opinion of the commission, should be assessed against the political subdivision. The time specified in the notice shall be not less than 10 days subsequent to the date of service.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

1415.

If the commission determines that the political subdivision, in case of a petition of the first class, has failed to commence the action in a court of competent jurisdiction within 60 days after the commission has made and filed its finding of just compensation, or that the political subdivision, in case of a petition of the second class, has failed to proceed diligently to submit the proposition to its voters or has failed, after its voters have voted in favor of the acquisition of the lands, property or rights, to file such action in a court of competent jurisdiction within 60 days thereafter, the commission shall make and file its order declaring that such finding shall no longer be of any force or effect, and make its finding as to the reasonable expenditures necessarily incurred by the owner in the proceeding before the commission, which should be assessed against the political subdivision. The political subdivision shall thereupon be liable to the owner in the amount thus found by the commission, and the owner may thereupon maintain an action against the political subdivision for such amount in any court of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

1416.

The finding of the commission fixing the just compensation to be paid by the political subdivision for the lands, property, and rights shall be final and shall not be subject to modification, alteration, reversal, or review by any court of this State. If the court in which the political subdivision has commenced its action, subsequent to the making and filing by the commission of its finding as to just compensation, decides that the political subdivision has the right and power under the law to take the lands, property, and rights, it shall enter a judgment in favor of the complainant in the action, fixing as the just compensation which shall be paid for the taking of the lands, property, and rights, the just compensation fixed by the commission. The judgment may include the allowance of such costs between the parties as is provided for in the law of eminent domain of this State. The judgment of the court insofar as it refers to the just compensation to be paid for the lands, property, and rights, shall be final and shall not be subject to modification, alteration, reversal, or review by any court except as specified in this chapter. The judgment of the court shall include a provision, in substance, that it is subject to modification by reason of such increase or decrease in the just compensation to be paid as may thereafter be certified to the court by the commission, as provided in this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

1417.

At any time within 30 days subsequent to the entry of such judgment, the owner of the lands, property, and rights may file with the commission a verified petition in writing, alleging that by reason of expenditures made by the owner subsequent to the date of the filing of the original petition with the commission, for the purpose of preserving or improving the lands, property, and rights, or by reason of other acts and occurrences subsequent to that date, the just compensation theretofore fixed by the commission should be increased, and praying that the commission make its finding increasing such compensation. At any time within 30 days subsequent to the entry of the judgment, the political subdivision may file with the commission a verified petition in writing, alleging that by reason of loss or destruction of the lands, property, and rights, or by reason of depreciation or deterioration thereof or by reason of other acts and occurrences, subsequent to the date of the filing of the original petition, the just compensation theretofore fixed by the commission should be decreased, and praying that the commission make its finding decreasing the compensation. The commission shall in each instance cause a copy of such petition or petitions to be served upon each party other than the petitioner, who was named as the political subdivision, owner, or claimant in the original proceeding before the commission, together with a written notice specifying the time and place of hearing on such petition or petitions, which time shall be within 45 days after the entry of the judgment by the court, and shall cause written notice of the time and place of the hearing to be served upon each petitioner in such petition or petitions. If both such petitions are filed, the commission may consolidate them for hearing and decision.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

1418.

After a hearing, the commission shall make and file its finding fixing, as of the date on which the finding is made and filed, the extent to which the just compensation theretofore fixed should be increased or decreased by reason of the matters alleged in the petition or petitions. If the claim is made that the just compensation theretofore fixed by the commission should be increased by reason of expenditures made by the owner subsequent to the date of the filing of the original petition with the commission for the purpose of preserving or improving the lands, property, and rights the commission may increase the just compensation only to the extent to which the commission determines that such expenditures were beneficial to the lands, property, and rights, and reasonably and prudently made. The finding of the commission fixing the extent to which the just compensation theretofore fixed should be thus increased or decreased shall be final and shall not be subject to modification, alteration, reversal, or review by any court of this State.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

1419.

The commission shall thereupon transmit to the court its finding, certified under the seal of the commission, fixing the extent to which the just compensation theretofore fixed by the commission shall be increased or decreased. The court shall thereupon modify its judgment so as to conform with the finding of the commission. The judgment of the court, as thus modified, insofar as it refers to the just compensation to be paid for the lands, property, and rights, shall be final and shall not be subject to modification, alteration, reversal, or review by any court. The filing of either or both the petitions specified in Section 1417 shall not act as a stay of the judgment in condemnation, but upon the payment of the just compensation fixed in the original judgment of condemnation the plaintiff in the action shall be entitled to immediate possession of the lands, property, and rights.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

1420.

(a) The provisions of this part with reference to rehearing and review shall be applicable to the findings of the commission made and filed under this chapter. Petitions for rehearing shall be filed within 20 days from the date of making and filing the finding as to which a rehearing is desired.
